Washington statutes.
RCW 19.09.071

Application for registration—Solicitation report—Violation.

Charitable organizations must ensure that the financial information included in the solicitation report fairly represents, in all material respects, the financial condition and results of operations of the organization as of, and for, the period presented to the secretary for filing. If the financial information submitted to the secretary is incorrect in any material way, it is a violation of this chapter and the charitable organization may be subject to penalties as provided under RCW 19.09.279.

[ 2011 c 199 s 7.]